Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-104.08
Child born out of wedlock; identify and inform biological father.

Whenever a child is claimed to be born out of wedlock and the biological mother contacts an adoption agency or attorney to relinquish her rights to the child, or the biological mother joins in a petition for adoption to be filed by a second adult person, the agency or attorney contacted shall attempt to establish the identity of the biological father and further attempt to inform the biological father of his rights, including the right to object to the adoption and the procedure and required timing to object, and his right to execute a relinquishment and consent to adoption, or a denial of paternity and waiver of rights, in the form mandated by section 43-106, pursuant to sections 43-104.08 to 43-104.24.

Laws 1995, LB 712, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB741, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB70, § 5.
July 18, 2026